Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201815-102
Declaration as city of the primary class; when.

Whenever any city of the first class shall attain a population of more than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, the mayor of such city shall certify such fact to the Secretary of State, who upon the filing of such certificate shall by proclamation declare such city to be of the primary class.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 2, p. 71;

R.S.1913, § 4405;

C.S.1922, § 3781;

C.S.1929, § 15-102;

R.S.1943, § 15-102;

Laws 1967, c. 53, § 1, p. 189;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 8.